District of Columbia statutes.
29-312.22

Receivership or custodianship.

(a)

Unless an election to purchase has been filed under § 29-312.24, the Superior Court in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to manage, the activities and affairs of the corporation. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its property wherever located.

(b)

The Superior Court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign corporation, authorized to do business in the District, as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

(c)

The Superior Court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended. Among other powers:

(1)

The receiver may:

(A)

Dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

(B)

Sue and defend in his or her own name as receiver of the corporation;

(2)

The custodian may exercise all of the powers of the corporation, through or in place of its board of directors, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the best interests of its shareholders and creditors.

(d)

The Superior Court during a receivership may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation, its shareholders, and its creditors.

(e)

The Superior Court during the receivership or custodianship may order compensation paid and expenses paid or reimbursed to the receiver or custodian from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(32), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities” for “business” in (a).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.